District of Columbia statutes.
6-321.04

Lease of property by Agency; other transfers limited; priority of owner of displaced business concern.

The Agency is hereby authorized, in accordance with the District of Columbia Redevelopment Act of 1945 and § 6-321.01, to lease or sell to a redevelopment company or other lessee or purchaser such real property as may be transferred to the Agency under the authority of this subchapter.

History

Sept. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 871, Pub. L. 86-736, § 4
Dec. 6, 1967, 81 Stat. 542, Pub. L. 90-176, § 1
July 9, 2012, 126 Stat. 990, Pub. L. 112-143,§ 1(d)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-825.
1973 Ed., § 5-723.

Effect of Amendments

Pub. L. 112-145 rewrote the section.